Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB775.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XVII-MPHOENIX EMPLOYEE AND RETURNSHIP TAX CREDITSSection 1701-M. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:12345678910111213141516171819202122 "Company." A corporation, partnership, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, business trust, affiliate, unincorporated joint venture or other business entity doing business in this Commonwealth."Department." The Department of Revenue of the Commonwealth."Educational program." A program offered by a secondary school or institution of higher education. The term does not include trainings or classes taken to maintain an occupational licensure or certification."Occupation of high demand." An occupation that has a shortage of qualified individuals to fill working positions as determined by the department in consultation with the Department of Labor and Industry."Phoenix employee." An employee or prospective employee who has not been enrolled in an educational program within the last three years and meets one of the following:(1) has been out of the workforce for two years; or(2) has been hired into a position that would increase the employee's earnings by at least 50% over the employee's previous company."Phoenix employee tax credit." A phoenix employee tax credit issued under section 1703-M."Returnship." A paid internship that reintroduces a phoenix employee into the workforce or an industry , with the intent of the company to hire the phoenix employee into a permanent, substantially similar position . "Returnship tax credit." A tax credit issued under section 1704-M.Section 1702-M. Eligibility.To be eligible to receive a phoenix employee tax credit or 20250HB0775PN0797 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 returnship tax credit under this article for occupations of high demand under this article, a company must demonstrate to the department:(1) The ability to hire or create jobs for phoenix employees.(2) The ability to provide applicable training and resources for phoenix employees who are reentering the workforce.(3) A signed statement stating the intent to retain a phoenix employee for at least three years.(4) A signed statement stating the intent to maintain operations in this Commonwealth for a period of five years from the date the company submits a phoenix employee tax credit or returnship tax credit certificate to the department.Section 1703-M. Phoenix employee tax credit.(a) Maximum amount.--A company may claim a phoenix employee tax credit equal to two times the percentage of the State personal income tax, prior to deductions, imposed on a phoenix employee within the company.(b) Evidence of phoenix employee.--The company shall submit the following evidence that the employee meets qualifications of a phoenix employee:(1) Evidence of a phoenix employee's salary from previous employment, if applicable.(2) Evidence of a phoenix employee's previous enrollment in an educational program, including photographic or written evidence of a degree or diploma, photographic or written evidence of enrollment in an educational program or other form of evidence deemed acceptable by the department.20250HB0775PN0797 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) Evidence that a job was created to hire a phoenix employee, if applicable.(c) Applicable taxes.--A company may apply the phoenix employee tax credit to 100% of the company's State corporate net income tax, capital stock and franchise tax or the capital stock and franchise tax of a shareholder of the company if the company is a Pennsylvania S corporation, gross premiums tax, gross receipts tax, bank and trust company shares tax, mutual thrift institution tax, title insurance company shares tax, personal income tax or the personal income tax of shareholders of a Pennsylvania S corporation or any combination thereof.(d) Phoenix employee tax credit term.--A company may claim a phoenix employee tax credit for each new phoenix employee hired or job created for three consecutive years after the phoenix employee's date of hire, provided that the phoenix employee is still employed by the company.(e) Limitation.--A company may not receive more than $150,000 in the first fiscal year in which phoenix employee tax credits are available, $300,000 in the second fiscal year and $450,000 in subsequent fiscal years in phoenix employee tax credits. This amount shall be adjusted to reflect any upward changes in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U) for the Pennsylvania, New Jersey, Delaware and Maryland area.(f) Availability of phoenix employee tax credit.--(1) During the first fiscal year in which phoenix employee tax credits are available, $15,000,000 in phoenix employee tax credits shall be made available to the department and may be awarded by the department under this section.20250HB0775PN0797 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) In the second fiscal year of the phoenix employee tax credit program, a minimum of $30,000,000 in phoenix employee tax credits shall be made available to the department and may be awarded by the department under this section. This amount shall be adjusted to reflect any upward changes in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U) for the Pennsylvania, New Jersey, Delaware and Maryland area.(3) In the third and subsequent fiscal years of the phoenix employee tax credit program, a minimum of $45,000,000 in phoenix employee tax credits shall be made available to the department and may be awarded by the department under this section. This amount shall be adjusted to reflect any upward changes in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U) for the Pennsylvania, New Jersey, Delaware and Maryland area.Section 1704-M. Returnship tax credit.(a) Duty of department.--The department shall establish standards for returnships that qualify for a returnship tax credit under this section.(b) Maximum amount of returnship tax credit.--A company may claim a returnship tax credit of $1,000 for each returnship completed by an employee in a tax year. This amount shall be adjusted to reflect any upward changes in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U) for the Pennsylvania, New Jersey, Delaware and Maryland area.(c) Limitation.--A company may not receive more than $100,000 in returnship tax credits in a year. This amount shall be adjusted to reflect any upward changes in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U) for the Pennsylvania, New 20250HB0775PN0797 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Jersey, Delaware and Maryland area.(d) Evidence of returnship.--To receive a tax credit under this section, a company must submit the following evidence of a returnship an employee completes to the department:(1) Salary of the returnship.(2) Certification of completion of the returnship.(3) Details of a job offer the employee was offered after the completion of the returnship.(4) Other evidence the department requires.(e) Applicable taxes.--A company may apply a returnship tax credit to 100% of the company's State corporate net income tax, capital stock and franchise tax or the capital stock and franchise tax of a shareholder of the company if the company is a Pennsylvania S corporation, gross premiums tax, gross receipts tax, bank and trust company shares tax, mutual thrift institution tax, title insurance company shares tax, personal income tax or the personal income tax of shareholders of a Pennsylvania S corporation or any combination thereof.(f) Availability of returnship tax credit.--Each fiscal year, $10,000,000 in returnship tax credits shall be made available to the department and may be awarded by the department under this section. In each subsequent year, this amount shall be adjusted to reflect any upward changes in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U) for the Pennsylvania, New Jersey, Delaware and Maryland area.Section 1705-M. Phoenix employee tax credit for occupations of high demand.(a) Occupations of high demand list.--The department shall consult with the Department of Labor and Industry and publish on the department's publicly accessible Internet website a list of 20250HB0775PN0797 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 occupations of high demand by January 1 of each year.(b) Credit amount.--The amount of a phoenix employee tax credit for occupations of high demand shall be $1,000 per year and contingent upon the phoenix employee's continued employment in the occupation of high demand and employment with the company that is receiving a phoenix employee tax credit for occupations of high demand under this section. This amount shall be adjusted to reflect any upward changes in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U) for the Pennsylvania, New Jersey, Delaware and Maryland area.(c) Phoenix employee tax credit.--A phoenix employee may apply the phoenix employee tax credit for occupations of high demand to the phoenix employee's personal income taxes.(d) Length of phoenix employee tax credit.--A phoenix employee may be eligible for the phoenix employee tax credit for occupations of high demand for a period of three consecutive years after the phoenix employee's date of hire.(e) Availability of phoenix employee tax credit for occupations of high demand.--(1) During the first fiscal year of the phoenix employee tax credit for occupations of high demand program, $10,000,000 in phoenix employee tax credits for occupations of high demand shall be made available to the department and may be awarded by the department under this section.(2) In the second fiscal year of the phoenix employee tax credit for occupations of high demand program, a minimum of $20,000,000 in phoenix employee tax credits for occupations of high demand shall be made available to the department and may be awarded by the department under this section. This amount shall be adjusted to reflect any upward 20250HB0775PN0797 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 changes in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U) for the Pennsylvania, New Jersey, Delaware and Maryland area.(3) In the third and subsequent fiscal years of the phoenix employee tax credit for occupations of high demand program, a minimum of $30,000,000 in phoenix employee tax credits for occupations of high demand shall be made available to the department and may be awarded by the department under this section. If a phoenix employee is terminated without cause, the employee is still eligible for a phoenix employee tax credit under this section despite the employee's termination. This amount shall be adjusted to reflect any upward changes in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U) for the Pennsylvania, New Jersey, Delaware and Maryland area.Section 1706-M. Fair payment of phoenix employees.No company shall pay a phoenix employee, either in salary or benefits, less than other employees of the same position and years of experience, including any prior experience in a similar job. The department may take complaints from employees regarding this article and shall investigate any credible complaint.Section 1707-M. Severing of employment.(a) Termination.--If a phoenix employee is terminated with cause, the company shall provide evidence to the department of the termination and if the termination was merited, the department shall provide the phoenix employee tax credit for that year. If the termination is found to be without cause and not merited, the department may not award the phoenix employee tax credit to the company.(b) Separation.--If a phoenix employee voluntarily separates 20250HB0775PN0797 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 from a company, the company shall receive the phoenix employee tax credit for that year.Section 1708-M. Penalties.(a) Failure to maintain operations.--A company that receives a phoenix employee tax credit or returnship tax credit and fails to substantially maintain existing operations or operations related to the phoenix employee tax credit or returnship tax credit for a period of five years from the date the company first receives the phoenix employee tax credit or returnship tax credit shall be required to refund to the Commonwealth the total amount of phoenix employee tax credit or returnship tax credit granted.(b) Fraud.--It is a felony of the third degree if a company or the company's representative, employee, agent or phoenix employee knowingly submits false documentation to the department or commits fraud to obtain benefits under this article.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0775PN0797 - 9 - 1234567891011121314151617